Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.280

Statement of restrictions applicable to real property.

(1) A property owner may make a written request for a statement of restrictions applicable to a single parcel, tract, lot, or block of real property to the code city in which the real property is located.

(2) Within thirty days of the receipt of the request, the code city shall provide the owner, by registered mail, with a statement of restrictions as described in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) The statement of restrictions shall include the following:

(a) The zoning currently applicable to the real property;

(b) Pending zoning changes currently advertised for public hearing that would be applicable to the real property;

(c) Any designations made by the code city pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW of any portion of the real property as agricultural land, forestland, mineral resource land, wetland, an area with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for potable water, a fish and wildlife habitat conservation area, a frequently flooded area, and as a geological hazardous area; and

(d) If information regarding the designations listed in (c) of this subsection are not readily available, inform the owner of the procedure by which the owner can obtain that site-specific information from the code city.

(4) If a code city fails to provide the statement of restrictions within thirty days after receipt of the written request, the owner shall be awarded recovery of all attorneys' fees and costs incurred in any successful application for a writ of mandamus to compel production of a statement.

(5) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Owner" means any vested owner or any person holding the buyer's interest under a recorded real estate contract in which the seller is the vested owner; and

(b) "Real property" means a parcel, tract, lot or block: (i) Containing a single-family residence that is occupied by the owner or a member of his or her family, or rented to another by the owner; or (ii) five acres or less in size.

(6) This section does not affect the vesting of permits or development rights.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to create any liability on the part of a code city.

[ 1996 c 206 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 206 ss 6-8: See note following RCW 35.21.475.

Findings—1996 c 206: See note following RCW 43.05.030.